Maine, session 132, LD1416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §101-D, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 38, §1, is further
amended to read:
B. Upon a determination by the State Forensic Service under paragraph A, a court
having jurisdiction in a criminal case may commit the defendant to the custody of the
Commissioner of Health and Human Services for immediate placement in an
appropriate institution for the care and treatment of people with mental illness or in an
appropriate residential program that provides care and treatment for persons who have
intellectual disabilities or autism for observation for a period not to exceed 60 days. If
the State Forensic Service requires additional time for observation, it shall
communicate its request and the reasons for that request to the court and to counsel for
the parties. The court shall accommodate a party's request to be heard on the issue of
whether an extension should be granted and may extend the commitment for up to an
additional 90 days. Unless the defendant objects, an order under this paragraph must
authorize the institution or residential program where the defendant is placed by the
Commissioner of Health and Human Services to provide treatment to the defendant.
When further observation of the defendant is determined no longer necessary by the
State Forensic Service, the Commissioner of Health and Human Services shall report
that determination to the court and the court shall terminate the commitment. If the
defendant is committed by the court to the custody of the Commissioner of Health and
Human Services for observation under this paragraph, the State Forensic Service may
release prior court-ordered evaluation reports pertaining to the pending charges, unless
otherwise impounded, to each institution or residential program into which the
Commissioner of Health and Human Services is considering placing the defendant and,
following placement, to the institution or residential program into which the defendant
is placed. If the defendant had been incarcerated prior to the commitment for
observation and if, during the period of observation, the defendant presents a
substantial risk of causing bodily injury to staff or others that cannot be managed in an
appropriate institution for the care and treatment of people with mental illness or in an
appropriate residential program that provides care and treatment for persons who have
intellectual disabilities or autism, the Commissioner of Health and Human Services
may return the defendant to the a state correctional facility but not to a county or
regional jail. The Commissioner of Health and Human Services shall report the risk
management issues to the court. Upon receiving the report, the court shall review the
report and may enter any order authorized by this section, including termination of the
commitment. For the purposes of this paragraph, "institution" and "residential
program" do not include a county or regional jail.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §101-D, sub-§5, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 306, §1, is
further amended to read:
A. Commit the defendant to the custody of the Commissioner of Health and Human
Services for immediate placement in an appropriate program for observation, care and
treatment of people with mental illness or persons with intellectual disabilities or
autism. An appropriate program may must be in an institution for the care and
treatment of people with mental illness, an intermediate care facility for persons who
have intellectual disabilities or autism, a crisis stabilization unit, a nursing home, a
Page 1 - 132LR2388(01)

416 residential care facility, an assisted living facility, a hospice, a hospital, an intensive
427 outpatient treatment program or any program specifically approved by the court, which
438 may not include a county or regional jail. At the end of 30 days or sooner, and again
449 in the event of recommitment, at the end of 60 days and 180 days, the State Forensic
550 Service or other appropriate office of the Department of Health and Human Services
561 shall forward a report to the Commissioner of Health and Human Services relative to
572 the defendant's competence to stand trial and its reasons. The Commissioner of Health
583 and Human Services shall without delay file the report with the court having
594 jurisdiction of the case. The court shall hold a hearing on the question of the
1505 defendant's competence to stand trial and receive all relevant testimony bearing on the
1516 question. If the State Forensic Service's report or the report of another appropriate
1527 office of the Department of Health and Human Services to the court states that the
1538 defendant is either now competent or not restorable, the court shall within 30 days hold
1549 a hearing. If the court determines that the defendant is not competent to stand trial, but
1650 there does exist a substantial probability that the defendant will be competent to stand
1661 trial in the foreseeable future, the court shall recommit the defendant to the custody of
1672 the Commissioner of Health and Human Services for immediate placement in an
1683 appropriate program for observation, care and treatment of people with mental illness
1694 or persons with intellectual disabilities or autism. An appropriate program may must
2605 be in an institution for the care and treatment of people with mental illness, an
2616 intermediate care facility for persons who have intellectual disabilities or autism, a
2627 crisis stabilization unit, a nursing home, a residential care facility, an assisted living
2638 facility, a hospice, a hospital, an intensive outpatient treatment program or any program
2649 specifically approved by the court, which may not include a county or regional jail.
2750 When a person who has been evaluated on behalf of the court by the State Forensic
2761 Service or other appropriate office of the Department of Health and Human Services is
2772 committed into the custody of the Commissioner of Health and Human Services under
2783 this paragraph, the court shall order that the State Forensic Service or other appropriate
2794 office of the Department of Health and Human Services share any information that it
3705 has collected or generated with respect to the person with the institution or residential
3716 program in which the person is placed; or
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §101-D, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 757, §1, is amended
to read:
10. Appropriate placement. When a court commits the defendant to the custody of
the Commissioner of Health and Human Services for placement in an appropriate
institution for the care and treatment of persons with mental illness or in an appropriate
residential program that provides care and treatment for persons who have intellectual
disabilities or autism as set forth in subsection 4 or 5, the transfer of the defendant must
take place within 30 days from the time the order is transmitted to the State Forensic
Service, unless an extraordinary circumstance causes a necessary delay. The Commissioner
of Health and Human Services shall notify the court of the extraordinary circumstance
causing a delay.
Page 2 - 132LR2388(01)